District of Columbia statutes.
22-402

Assault with intent to commit mayhem or with dangerous weapon.

Every person convicted of an assault with intent to commit mayhem, or of an assault with a dangerous weapon, shall be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than 10 years. In addition to any other penalty provided under this section, a person may be fined an amount not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1321, ch. 854, § 804
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 303(e), 60 DCR 2064
Additional penalty for possession of firearm, see § 22-4502.
This section is referenced in § 5-132.21, § 7-2508.01, and § 24-112.
1981 Ed., § 22-502.
1973 Ed., § 22-502.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added the last sentence.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 303(e) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.